Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. ATTORNEYS

CHAPTER 83. CERTAIN UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF LAW

Sec. 83.001. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) A person, other than a person described in Subsection (b), may not charge or receive, either directly or indirectly, any compensation for all or any part of the preparation of a legal instrument affecting title to real property, including a deed, deed of trust, note, mortgage, and transfer or release of lien.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) an attorney licensed in this state;

(2) a licensed real estate broker or salesperson performing the acts of a real estate broker pursuant to Chapter 1101, Occupations Code; or

(3) a person performing acts relating to a transaction for the lease, sale, or transfer of any mineral or mining interest in real property.

(c) This section does not prevent a person from seeking reimbursement for costs incurred by the person to retain a licensed attorney to prepare an instrument.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 115, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.776, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 83.002. EXPENSES. This chapter does not prevent an attorney from paying secretarial, paralegal, or other ordinary and reasonable expenses necessarily and actually incurred by the attorney for the preparation of legal instruments.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 83.003. FORMS. This chapter does not prevent a person from completing lease or rental forms that:

(1) have been prepared by an attorney licensed in this state and approved by the attorney for the particular kind of transaction involved; or

(2) have been prepared by the property owner or prepared by an attorney and required by the property owner.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 83.004. CUMULATIVE REMEDIES. This chapter is not exclusive and does not limit or restrict the definition of the practice of law in the State Bar Act (Chapter 81). This chapter does not limit or restrict any remedy provided in the State Bar Act or any other law designed to eliminate the unauthorized practice of law by lay persons and lay agencies.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 83.005. RECOVERY. A person who pays a fee prohibited by this chapter may bring suit for and is entitled to:

(1) recovery of the fee paid;

(2) damages equal to three times the fee paid; and

(3) court costs and reasonable and necessary attorney's fees.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 83.006. UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF LAW. A violation of this chapter constitutes the unauthorized practice of law and may be enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.43(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.